Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.466

Presence of certificated personnel at schools before and after school—Policy.

Each school district board of directors shall adopt a policy regarding the presence at their respective schools of teachers and other certificated personnel before the opening of school in the morning and after the closing of school in the afternoon or evening. The board of directors shall make the policy available to parents and the public through the school district report card and other means of communication.

[ 2006 c 263 s 902.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.